Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5425
Health carrier; oversight of utilization review activities.

A health carrier shall be responsible for monitoring all utilization review activities carried out by, or on behalf of, the health carrier and for ensuring that all requirements of the Utilization Review Act and applicable rules and regulations are met. The health carrier shall also ensure that appropriate personnel have operational responsibility for the conduct of the health carrier's utilization review program.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 10.